Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4328.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1.  Said chapter 69 is hereby amended by striking out sections 1J and 1K, as 
so appearing, and inserting in place thereof the following section: 
Section 1J. (a) The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall identify 
schools for comprehensive support and improvement using a formula developed by the 
department that complies with the criteria and processes in federal education law; provided that, 
under this formula, student growth shall be given at least as much weight as student 
achievement, and provided further that no more than five per cent of all schools statewide shall 
be designated as comprehensive support and improvement schools at one time. 
(b) Within 30 days of a school being designated as in need of comprehensive support and 
improvement, the superintendent of the district shall convene a local stakeholder group of not 
more than 11 individuals to develop a support and improvement plan for the school. The district 
should strive to have the group membership represent the racial-ethnic and language diversity of 

of 9 13 the school. The group shall include: (1) the superintendent, or a designee; (2) a representative 
from the school committee selected by a majority of school committee members; (3) the 
president of the local teachers union, or a designee; (4) an administrator from the school, who 
may be the principal, chosen by the superintendent; (5) two educators (who could be teachers or 
education support professionals) from the school, chosen by the school’s educators; (6) a parent 
from the school, chosen by the local parent organization, provided that if the school or district 
does not have a parent organization or if the organization does not select a parent, the 
superintendent shall select a volunteer parent of a student from the school; (7) for high schools, a 
student selected by the students at the school, and for other schools, an individual selected by the 
superintendent who brings the appropriate grade-level perspective to the group (e.g., a 
representative from the early childhood or pre-kindergarten sector for an elementary school); (8) 
an educator or representative from the social services sector with expertise in students’ mental 
health and social-emotional development, selected jointly by the group; (9) a member 
representing a community organization, selected jointly by the group; and 10) an individual who 
has specialized expertise in one or more of the evidence-based programs listed in subsection (c), 
selected jointly by the group. 
(c) The local stakeholder group shall develop a support and improvement plan for the 
school, consistent with federal and state law, a final draft of which shall be submitted to the 
school committee within 45 days of its first meeting. Consistent with guidelines developed by 
the department, the group shall: (i) research, identify and analyze the root causes of the school’s 
challenges; (ii) examine the adequacy of resources and equity in the distribution of those 
resources, including an assessment of the physical condition of the school building; and (iii) 
identify and catalog the school’s strengths and assets. The final draft plan submitted to the school 

of 9 36 committee shall include a guiding vision of learning for the school; goals and objectives; and a 
description of the evidence-based programs, supports and interventions that the district shall 
employ to address the root causes of the school’s challenges and capitalize on assets consistent 
with the guiding vision.  Such evidence-based programs, supports and interventions may include: 
(1) reduced class sizes and student caseloads; (2) small-group instruction and/or one-on-one 
tutoring; (3) increased opportunity for common planning time for teachers; (4) implementation of 
a “Community Schools” or “Hub School” model or other strategies for expanding social and 
wraparound services to support students’ social-emotional and physical health; (5) additional 
hiring, increased compensation, and/or strategic deployment of school personnel (e.g, coteaching 
to facilitate inclusion) to support student learning and to retain highly qualified staff; (6) 
increased or improved professional development, which may include mentoring and induction 
programs for new teachers, as well as training in trauma-informed and anti-racist best practices 
that are designed to limit school exclusion and maximize student engagement; (7) the use of 
effective curriculum materials that are culturally responsive and aligned with the statewide 
curriculum frameworks; (8) expanded early education and pre-kindergarten programming within 
the district in consultation or in partnership with community-based organizations; (9) 
diversifying the educator and administrator workforce; (10) developing additional pathways to 
strengthen college and career readiness; and (11) any other program determined to be evidence 
based by the group that addresses root causes of challenges identified in its analysis.  
(d) The local stakeholder group shall make every effort to reach consensus on the final 
draft plan and shall submit it to the school committee for review and approval.  If consensus 
cannot be reached, a majority of the group shall submit its final draft plan to the school 
committee for review and approval. Dissenting members of the group may submit an alternative 

of 9 59 final draft plan to the school committee for consideration, clearly indicating the areas of dissent.  
Upon receipt of the final draft plan or plans, the school committee shall hold at least one public 
hearing, giving at least 30 days’ public notice. The school committee may make modifications to 
the final draft plan as necessary, consistent with federal and state law, and shall vote on the final 
draft plan within 30 days of the hearing. The final plan shall be shared publicly and filed with the 
commissioner. After confirming that the requirements of subsections (b) through (d) were 
complied with, the commissioner shall approve the final plan.   
(e) The department shall prioritize comprehensive support and improvement schools for 
additional funding above and beyond chapter 70 allocations to support the evidence-based 
programs identified in the final approved plan. Before the local stakeholder group commences its 
work, the department shall provide the group with an estimate of future Chapter 70 aid for the 
district and available funds in excess of Chapter 70 aid for the school that shall support the final 
approved plan. 
(f) The support and improvement plan shall be in effect for not more than four years, and 
shall be reviewed annually by the superintendent pursuant to guidelines developed by the 
department. Such progress reviews shall be shared publicly and filed with the commissioner, 
who may comment on the reviews. 
(g) The department shall establish exit criteria for schools in need of comprehensive 
support and improvement using a formula that complies with federal education law. Upon 
expiration of the final approved plan, the commissioner shall review the school’s progress and 
determine, based solely on the exit criteria established by the department, whether: (1) the school 
is exited from comprehensive support and improvement status; or (2) the status and plan shall 

of 9 81 continue for up to four additional years. If the commissioner determines that the status and plan 
shall continue, the local stakeholder group shall be reconvened to revise the final approved plan, 
consistent with subsections (b) through (d) and subject to approval by the commissioner.  If not 
approved, the commissioner shall return the plan to the group with a directive to add specific 
evidence-based programs, supports and interventions listed in (1) through (10) of subsection (c).  
Within 30 days, the group shall submit the plan to the school committee for review and approval. 
Within 30 days of receipt of the plan from the group, the school committee shall submit the final 
plan to the commissioner.  
(h) Upon the expiration of any continued or revised plan, the process in subsection (g) 
shall be replicated. 
(i) The school committee of any district with schools which have been deemed 
underperforming or chronically unperforming shall develop a transition plan for transition to the 
current section 1J of this act which shall be implemented with transition to the current section 
within 1 year of the effective date of this act.  The transition plan shall be implemented and any 
school receivership shall end within 1 year of the effective date of this Act. The  department shall 
provide the school committee with the necessary funding and technical assistance to develop and 
implement the transition plan. 
(j) The board shall adopt regulations to implement this section, including provisions that 
allow features of a support and improvement plan to continue for up to two years after a school is 
100 exited from comprehensive support and improvement status. The department shall also make 
101 every effort to continue additional funding during any transitional period. 

of 9 102  SECTION 2.  The school committee of any district in receivership shall develop a 
103 transition plan for ending the receivership and hiring a superintendent.  The transition plan shall 
104 be implemented and the receivership shall end within 1 year of the effective date of this Act. The  
105 department shall provide the school committee with the necessary funding and technical 
106 assistance to develop and implement the transition plan. 
107  SECTION 3. (a) There shall be a special commission to study and make 
108 recommendations for a more authentic and accurate system for assessing students, schools and 
109 school districts. The commission shall examine: (i) the requirements of the Every Student 
110 Succeeds Act of 2015, codified at 20 U.S.C. § 6301 et. seq., and potential waivers; (ii) 
111 alternative assessment and accountability systems in place or being considered nationwide; and  
112 research data on the knowledge and skills that parents, elementary and secondary educators,  
113 higher education educators, and business leaders want students to have upon high school  
114 graduation. 
115  Regarding the assessment of students, the special commission shall consider assessments 
116 other than conventional methods, including, but not limited to: work samples, projects and 
117 portfolios, performance assessments and other authentic and direct gauges of student 
118 performance that encourage effective instruction, use strategies for avoiding racial and ethnic 
119 biases, and recognize the strengths of all students. 
120  Regarding the assessment of schools and districts, the special commission shall consider 
121 the inclusion of a broader range of measures, beyond standardized test scores, that align with 
122 public values and are less tied to student demography. The commission shall also research best 
123 practices for facilitating stakeholder-driven improvement processes in schools identified under 

of 9 124 federal law as needing comprehensive support, such as the creation of community schools. The 
125 commission shall recommend strategies for assessing students, schools and districts that comply 
126 with current federal law. The commission also may make recommendations for changes in or 
127 waivers from federal law that would facilitate the implementation of effective assessment 
128 strategies. 
129  (b) The commission shall consist of: 1 member who shall be appointed by the president 
130 of the senate, who shall serve as co-chair; 1 member who shall be appointed by the speaker of 
131 the house of representatives, who shall serve as co-chair; 1 member who shall be appointed by 
132 the minority leader of the senate; 1 member who shall be appointed by the minority leader of the 
133 house of representatives; the secretary of education, or a designee; the commissioner of 
134 elementary and secondary education, or a designee; 1 member who shall be appointed by the 
135 Massachusetts Association of School Committees, Inc.; 1 member who shall be appointed by the 
136 Massachusetts Teachers Association; 1 member who shall be appointed by the American 
137 Federation of Teachers, Massachusetts; 1 member who shall be appointed by the Massachusetts 
138 Association of School Superintendents, Inc.; 1 member who shall be appointed by the 
139 Massachusetts Education Justice Alliance (MEJA); 1 member who shall be appointed by the 
140 NAACP; 1 member who shall be appointed by the Massachusetts Immigrant and Refugee 
141 Advocacy (MIRA) Coalition; 1 member who shall be appointed by Multicultural Education, 
142 Training, and Advocacy, Inc; 1 member who shall be appointed by the Massachusetts 
143 Consortium for Innovative Education Assessment; 1 member who shall be appointed by the 
144 Black Educators Alliance of Massachusetts; 1 member who shall be appointed by the 
145 Massachusetts Asian American Educators Association; 1 member who shall be appointed by the 
146 Gaston Institute for Latino Community Development and Public Policy of the University of 

of 9 147 Massachusetts Boston; 1 member who shall be appointed by the Massachusetts Advocates for 
148 Children; 1 member who shall be appointed by the Center for Law and Education; 1 member 
149 who shall be appointed by the Center for Antiracist Research at Boston University; 1 of whom 
150 shall be the student representative on the State Board of Education, or a designee; 1 of whom 
151 shall be the parent representative on the State Board of Education, or a designee; 1 member who 
152 shall be appointed by the Rural Policy Advisory Commission; 1 member who shall be appointed 
153 by GLSEN Massachusetts; and 1 member who shall be a researcher from a public university 
154 with expertise in the area of assessment, selected jointly by the members of the commission. 
155 Members shall not receive compensation for their services but may receive reimbursement for 
156 reasonable expenses incurred in carrying out their responsibilities as members of the 
157 commission. The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall furnish reasonable 
158 staff and other support for the work of the commission. 
159  (c) The commission shall hold not less than 5 public meetings across the regions of the 
160 commonwealth and may hold additional hearings and other forums as necessary. The 
161 commission shall file its report and recommendations with the clerks of the senate and the house 
162 of representatives, the chairs of the joint committee on education and the rural policy advisory 
163 commission not later than August 31, 2025.  
164  SECTION 4. Section 89 of chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking 
165 out Subsection (i) (3), as appearing in the XXXX Official Edition, and by further striking out 
166 subsection (i) (2) and inserting in place thereof the following section:  
167  (2) In any fiscal year, no public school district's total charter school tuition payment to 
168 commonwealth charter schools shall exceed 9 per cent of the district's net school spending. The 

of 9 169 commonwealth shall incur charter school tuition payments for siblings attending commonwealth 
170 charter schools to the extent that their attendance would otherwise cause the school district's 
171 charter school tuition payments to exceed 9 per cent of the school district's net school spending.